Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 5. Enforcement and Appeal Procedure.

§ 62.1-44.20.
Right to entry to obtain information, etc.

Any duly authorized agent of the Board may, at reasonable times and under reasonable circumstances, enter any establishment or upon any property, public or private, for the purpose of obtaining information or conducting surveys or investigations necessary in the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-34; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638.

§ 62.1-44.21.
Information to be furnished to Board.

The Board may require every owner to furnish when requested such plans, specifications, and other pertinent information as may be necessary to determine the effect of the wastes from his discharge on the quality of state waters, or such other information as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. The Board shall not at any time disclose to any person other than appropriate officials of the Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the requirements of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (P.L. 92-500) any secret formulae, secret processes, or secret methods other than effluent data used by any owner or under that owner’s direction.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-35; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1974, c. 237.

§ 62.1-44.22.
(For expiration date — see notes) Private rights not affected.

The fact that any owner holds or has held a certificate issued under this chapter shall not constitute a defense in any civil action involving private rights.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-36; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.22

.

§ 62.1-44.22.
(For effective date — see notes) Private actions.

The fact that any owner holds or has held a certificate or land-disturbance approval issued under this chapter shall not constitute a defense in any civil action involving private rights.

Compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be prima facie evidence in any legal or equitable proceeding for damages caused by erosion or sedimentation that all requirements of law have been met and the complaining party must show negligence in order to recover any damages.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-36; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.22

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and inserted “or land-disturbance approval” in the first paragraph and added the second paragraph. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.23.
(For expiration date — see notes) Enforcement by injunction, etc.

Any person violating or failing, neglecting or refusing to obey any rule, regulation, order, water quality standard, pretreatment standard, or requirement of or any provision of any certificate issued by the Board, or by the owner of a publicly owned treatment works issued to an industrial user, or any provisions of this chapter, except as provided by a separate article, may be compelled in a proceeding instituted in any appropriate court by the Board to obey same and to comply therewith by injunction, mandamus or other appropriate remedy.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-37; 1952, c. 702; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1977, c. 263; 1988, c. 167; 1990, c. 717; 1994, c. 489; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.23

.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and inserted “except as provided by a separate article.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1976-1977, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1377 (1977).

For comment on the problem of enforcement with regard to the secondary treatment standards pursuant to the 1972 Federal Water Pollution Control Act amendments, see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 581 (1978).

§ 62.1-44.23.
(For effective date — see notes) Enforcement by injunction, etc.

Any person violating or failing, neglecting or refusing to obey any rule, regulation, order, water quality standard, pretreatment standard, approved standard and specification, or requirement of or any provision of any certificate or land-disturbance approval issued by the Board, or by the owner of a publicly owned treatment works issued to an industrial user, or any provisions of this chapter, except as provided by a separate article, may be compelled in a proceeding instituted in any appropriate court by the Board to obey same and to comply therewith by injunction, mandamus or other appropriate remedy.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-37; 1952, c. 702; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1977, c. 263; 1988, c. 167; 1990, c. 717; 1994, c. 489; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.23

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and inserted “approved standard and specification,” and “or land-disturbance approval.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.23:1.
Intervention of Commonwealth in actions involving surface water withdrawals.

The Board, in representing the public’s interest, shall have the authority and standing to intervene as an interested party in any civil action, including actions both within and without the Commonwealth, pertaining to the withdrawal of any of the surface waters of the Commonwealth.

History.

1989, c. 218.

§ 62.1-44.24.
Testing validity of regulations; judicial review.

The validity of any regulation may be determined through judicial review in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

[Repealed.]

An appeal may be taken from the decision of the court to the Court of Appeals as provided by law.

History.

1970, c. 638; 1984, c. 703; 1986, c. 615.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1603 (1970).

For survey of Virginia law on municipal corporations and administrative law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1971).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2 Potential Jurisdiction. § 2.03 Courts. Bryson.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 18.

§ 62.1-44.25.
(For expiration date — see notes) Right to hearing.

Any owner under §§

62.1-44.16

,

62.1-44.17

, and

62.1-44.19

aggrieved by any action of the Board taken without a formal hearing, or by inaction of the Board, may demand in writing a formal hearing of such owner’s grievance, provided a petition requesting such hearing is filed with the Board. In cases involving actions of the Board, such petition must be filed within thirty days after notice of such action is mailed to such owner by certified mail.

History.

1970, c. 638.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2017, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.25

.

§ 62.1-44.25.
(For effective date — see notes) Right to hearing.

Any owner under Article 2.3 (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.), Article 2.5 (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.), or §

62.1-44.16

,

62.1-44.17

, or

62.1-44.19

aggrieved by any action of the Board taken without a formal hearing, or by inaction of the Board, may demand in writing a formal hearing of such owner’s grievance, provided a petition requesting such hearing is filed with the Board. In cases involving actions of the Board, such petition must be filed within 30 days after notice of such action is mailed to such owner by certified mail.

History.

1970, c. 638; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.25

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and inserted “Article 2.3 (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.), Article 2.5 (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.), or” and made minor stylistic changes. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.26.
Hearings.

(For expiration date — see notes) The formal hearings held under this chapter shall be conducted pursuant to §

2.2-4009

or

2.2-4020

and may be conducted by the Board itself at a regular or special meeting of the Board, or by at least one member of the Board designated by the chairman to conduct such hearings on behalf of the Board at any other time and place authorized by the Board.

A verbatim record of the proceedings of such hearings shall be taken and filed with the Board. Depositions may be taken and read as in actions at law.

The Board shall have power to issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum, and at the request of any party shall issue such subpoenas. The failure of a witness without legal excuse to appear or to testify or to produce documents shall be acted upon by the Board in the manner prescribed in §

2.2-4022

. Witnesses who are subpoenaed shall receive the same fees and mileage as in civil actions.

A.

(For effective date — see notes)

The formal hearings held by the Board under this chapter shall be conducted pursuant to §

2.2-4009

or

2.2-4020

and may be conducted by the Board itself at a regular or special meeting of the Board, or by at least one member of the Board designated by the chairman to conduct such hearings on behalf of the Board at any other time and place authorized by the Board.

History.

1970, c. 638; 1977, c. 291; 1993, c. 897; 2008, cc. 276, 557; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Subsection A set out twice.

The second version of subsection A above is effective on July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For subsection A as in effect until that time, see the first version.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act do not apply to any permit action public noticed prior to July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 3 provides: “That regulatory actions necessary to implement the provisions of this act are exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 276 and 557 are identical, and substituted “The formal hearings held under this chapter shall be conducted pursuant to §

2.2-4009

or

2.2-4020

and may” for “The hearings held under this chapter may” in subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and inserted “by the Board” near the beginning of Subsection A. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.27.
Rules of evidence in hearings.

In all hearings under this chapter:

All relevant and material evidence shall be received, except that (a) the rules relating to privileged communications and privileged topics shall be observed; (b) hearsay evidence shall be received only if the declarant is not readily available as a witness; and (c) secondary evidence of the contents of a document shall be received only if the original is not readily available. In deciding whether a witness or document is readily available, the Board or hearing officer shall balance the importance of the evidence against the difficulty of obtaining it, and the more important the evidence is the more effort should be made to produce the eyewitness or the original document.

All reports of inspectors and subordinates of the Board and other records and documents in the possession of the Board bearing on the case shall be introduced by the Board at the hearing.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision (1) of this section every party shall have the right to cross-examine adverse witnesses and any inspector or subordinate of the Board whose report is in evidence and to submit rebuttal evidence.

The decision of the Board shall be based only on evidence received at the hearing and matters of which a court of record could take judicial notice.

History.

1970, c. 638.

§ 62.1-44.28.
Decisions of the Board in hearings pursuant to §§ 62.1-44.15 and 62.1-44.25.

To be valid and operative, the decision by the Board rendered pursuant to hearings under subdivisions (8a), (8b), and (8c) of §§

62.1-44.15

and

62.1-44.25

must be reduced to writing and contain the explicit findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which the decision of the Board is based and certified copies thereof must be mailed by certified mail to the parties affected by it.

History.

1970, c. 638.

§ 62.1-44.29.
(For expiration date — see notes) Judicial review.

Any owner aggrieved by or any person who has participated, in person or by submittal of written comments, in the public comment process related to a final decision of the Board under §

62.1-44.15

(5),

62.1-44.15

(8a), (8b), and (8c),

62.1-44.15:20

,

62.1-44.15:21

,

62.1-44.15:22

,

62.1-44.15:23

,

62.1-44.16

,

62.1-44.17

,

62.1-44.19

, or

62.1-44.25

, whether such decision is affirmative or negative, is entitled to judicial review thereof in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) if such person meets the standard for obtaining judicial review of a case or controversy pursuant to Article III of the United States Constitution. A person shall be deemed to meet such standard if (i) such person has suffered an actual or imminent injury which is an invasion of a legally protected interest and which is concrete and particularized; (ii) such injury is fairly traceable to the decision of the Board and not the result of the independent action of some third party not before the court; and (iii) such injury will likely be redressed by a favorable decision by the court.

History.

1970, c. 638; 1986, c. 615; 1996, c. 1032; 2000, cc. 1032, 1054; 2007, c. 659.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.29

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1996, c. 1032, cl. 4, provides: “[t]hat the second enactment of this act [which amended this section] shall not be effective unless and until a final and unappealable decision of a court of competent jurisdiction declaring that subsection B of
§ 10.1-1318 as it is currently effective does not meet the requirements for state program approval under Title V of the federal Clean Air Act or regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to standing to seek judicial review of state permitting decisions.” The 1996 amendment became effective January 21, 1997, the date of the final and unappealable decision referred to throughout the act.

Acts
1996, c. 1032, cl. 5,
as amended by Acts
1997, c. 520, cl. 1, provides: “That the “final and unappealable decision of a court of competent jurisdiction” referred to in enactment clauses 3 and 4 was rendered by the United States Supreme Court in the case of Commonwealth vs. Browner on January 21, 1997.”

Acts
2000, cc. 1032 and
1045, cl. 4 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to restrict the State Water Control Board’s authority to issue Virginia Water Protection Permits for activities requiring certification under § 401 of the Clean Water Act.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 1032 and 1054 are identical, and inserted “62.1-44.15:5” in the first sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 659 substituted “62.1-44.15:20,

62.1-44.15:21

,

62.1-44.15:22

,

62.1-44.15:23

” for “62.1-44.15:5.”

Law Review.

For article discussing decisions of Virginia courts dealing with state administrative procedures between June 1, 2002 and June 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2003).

For article, “Why Does the Chesapeake Bay Need Litigators?,” see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1113 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

For article, “Construction Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 227 (2010).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2 Potential Jurisdiction. § 2.03 Courts. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 39 Appeals to Circuit Courts. § 39.06 Appeals under the Administrative Process Act. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 16; 5A M.J. Courts, § 47; 20 M.J. Waters and Watercourses, § 19.1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 30; 9A M.J. Fraudulent and Voluntary Conveyances, § 126; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 30, 32.

§ 62.1-44.29.
(For effective date — see notes) Judicial review.

Any owner aggrieved by or any person who has participated, in person or by submittal of written comments, in the public comment process related to a final decision of the Board under subdivision (5), (8a), (8b), (8c), or (19) of §

62.1-44.15

or §

62.1-44.15:20

,

62.1-44.15:21

,

62.1-44.15:22

,

62.1-44.15:23

,

62.1-44.16

,

62.1-44.17

,

62.1-44.19

, or

62.1-44.25

, whether such decision is affirmative or negative, is entitled to judicial review thereof in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) if such person meets the standard for obtaining judicial review of a case or controversy pursuant to Article III of the United States Constitution. A person shall be deemed to meet such standard if (i) such person has suffered an actual or imminent injury which is an invasion of a legally protected interest and which is concrete and particularized; (ii) such injury is fairly traceable to the decision of the Board and not the result of the independent action of some third party not before the court; and (iii) such injury will likely be redressed by a favorable decision by the court.

History.

1970, c. 638; 1986, c. 615; 1996, c. 1032; 2000, cc. 1032, 1054; 2007, c. 659; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.29

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by
cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and substituted “subdivision (5), (8a), (8b), (8c), or (19) of §

62.1-44.15

” for “§

62.1-44.15

(5),

62.1-44.15

(8a), (8b), and (8c).” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.30.
Appeal to Court of Appeals.

From the final decision of the circuit court an appeal may be taken to the Court of Appeals as provided in §

17.1-405

.

History.

1970, c. 638; 1984, c. 703.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 38 Appeals to the Court of Appeals of Virginia. § 38.30 Appeals Under the Administrative Process Act. Friend.